Utah statutes.
53A-17a-126.   State support of pupil transportation.
(1)  Money appropriated to the State Board of Education in Section 53A-17a-104
for state-supported transportation of public school students shall be
apportioned and distributed in accordance with Section 53A-17a-127, except as
otherwise provided in this section.
(2) (a)  The Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind shall use money
appropriated in Section 53A-17a-104 to pay for transportation of their
students based on current valid contractual arrangements and best
transportation options and methods as determined by the schools.
(b)  All student transportation costs of the schools shall be paid from the
allocation of pupil transportation monies received under Section 53A-17a-104.
(3) (a)  A school district may only claim eligible transportation costs as
legally reported on the prior year's annual financial report submitted under
Section 53A-3-404.
(b)  The state shall contribute 85% of approved transportation costs, subject
to budget constraints.
(c)  If in a fiscal year the total transportation allowance for all districts
exceeds the amount appropriated for that purpose, all allowances shall be
reduced pro rata to equal not more than the amount appropriated.
(4)  Local school boards shall provide salary adjustments to employee groups
that work with the transportation of students comparable to those of
classified employees authorized under Section 53A-17a-137, when dividing the
weighted pupil unit for salary adjustment purposes.
